en: Riding toy features: Adjustable handlebars; Adjustable seat; Brake; Canopy / sun shade; Cup holder; Foldable; Footrests; Front basket; Horn; Lights; Non-slip footboard; Parent push handle; Removable ride-on bar; Safety flag; Seat belt / harness; Sounds/Music; Steering wheel; Tow handle; Under-seat storage; Other
ru: Особенности игрушки для катания: Регулируемый руль; Регулируемое сиденье; Тормоз; Козырек / навес от солнца; Подстаканник; Складная конструкция; Подножки; Передняя корзина; Клаксон; Фары; Нескользящая подножка; Родительская ручка; Съемный поручень-бампер; Флажок безопасности; Ремень безопасности / система ремней; Звуки/музыка; Рулевое колесо; Ручка для буксировки; Отсек под сиденьем; Другое
sk-SK: Funkcie jazdných hračiek: Nastaviteľné riadidlá; Nastaviteľné sedadlo; Brzda; Strieška/slnečná clona; Držiak na pohár; Skladacia; Opierky na nohy; Predný košík; Klaksón; Svetlá; Protišmyková stúpačka; Rodičovská rukoväť; Odnímateľná tyč pre vozidlá; Bezpečnostná vlajka; Bezpečnostný pás/postroj; Zvuky/hudba; Volant; Rukoväť na ťahanie; Úložný priestor pod sedadlom; Iné
fi: Ratsastuslelun ominaisuudet: Säädettävä ohjaustanko; Säädettävä istuin; Jarru; Katos / aurinkosuoja; Mukiteline; Taitettava; Jalkatuet; Etukori; Äänitorvi; Valot; Liukumaton astinlauta; Työntökahva vanhemmalle; Irrotettava työntötanko; Turvaviiri; Turvavyö/valjaat; Äänet/musiikki; Ohjauspyörä; Vetokahva; Säilytystila istuimen alla; Muu
hr-HR: Značajke igračke za jahanje: Podesivi upravljač; Podesivo sjedalo; Kočnica; Krović / sjenilo; Držač za čaše; Sklopivo; Oslonci za noge; Prednja košara; Truba; Svjetla; Protuklizno gazište; Ručka za guranje za roditelje; Uklonjiva šipka za vožnju; Sigurnosna zastavica; Sigurnosni pojas / remenje; Zvukovi/Glazba; Upravljač; Ručka za vuču; Spremište ispod sjedala; Ostalo
hu: Lovagló játék jellemzői: Állítható kormány; Állítható ülés; Fék; Napellenző/árnyékoló; Pohártartó; Összecsukható; Lábtartók; Első kosár; Duda; Világítás; Csúszásgátló lábtartó; Szülői tolókar; Levehető kapaszkodó; Biztonsági zászló; Biztonsági öv / heveder; Hangok / zene; Kormánykerék; Vontatófogantyú; Ülés alatti tároló; Egyéb
th: ของเล่นสำหรับขี่ มีคุณสมบัติ: แฮนด์ปรับระดับได้; เบาะนั่งปรับได้; เบรก; หลังคา / ที่บังแดด; ที่วางแก้ว; พับได้; ที่พักเท้า; ตะกร้าหน้า; แตร; ไฟ; แผ่นวางเท้ากันลื่น; ด้ามเข็นสำหรับผู้ปกครอง; บาร์กันตกแบบถอดได้; ธงเพื่อความปลอดภัย; เข็มขัดนิรภัย/สายรัด; เสียง/เพลง; พวงมาลัย; ที่จับสำหรับลาก; ที่เก็บของใต้เบาะ; อื่นๆ
cs: Vlastnosti hraček na jízdu: Nastavitelná řídítka; Nastavitelné sedadlo; Brzda; Stříška/slunečník; Držák na pití; Skládací; Opěrky nohou; Přední košík; Klakson; Světla; Protiskluzové stupátko; Vodicí tyč pro rodiče; Odnímatelné madlo; Bezpečnostní vlajka; Bezpečnostní pás / postroj; Zvuky/hudba; Volant; Tažná rukojeť; Úložný prostor pod sedadlem; Jiné
ko: 승용 장난감 특징: 조절형 핸들바; 조절형 시트; 브레이크; 캐노피/차양; 컵 홀더; 접이식; 발받침대; 전면 바스켓; 경적; 조명; 미끄럼 방지 발판; 보호자 푸시 핸들; 탈착식 승용 바; 안전 깃발; 안전벨트/하네스; 사운드/음악; 스티어링 휠; 견인 핸들; 시트 하단 수납공간; 기타
es: Características del juguete para montar: Manillar ajustable; Asiento ajustable; Freno; Toldo/parasol; Portavasos; Plegable; Reposapiés; Cesta frontal; Bocina; Luces; Estribo antideslizante; Asa de empuje para padres; Barra de conducción extraíble; Bandera de seguridad; Cinturón de seguridad / arnés; Sonidos/música; Volante; Asa de remolque; Almacenamiento debajo del asiento; Otro
nb: Funksjoner for rideleken: Justerbart styre; Justerbart sete; Brems; Kalesje / solskjerm; Koppholder; Sammenleggbar; Fotstøtter; Kurv foran; Horn; Lys; Sklisikkert fotbrett; Skyvehåndtak for foreldre; Avtakbar sikkerhetsbøyle; Sikkerhetsflagg; Sikkerhetsbelte / sele; Lyder/musikk; Ratt; Trekkhåndtak; Oppbevaring under setet; Annet
vi: Đặc điểm của đồ chơi cưỡi: Tay lái có thể điều chỉnh; Yên xe có thể điều chỉnh; Phanh; Mái vòm / tấm che nắng; Khay đựng cốc; Có thể gập lại; Chỗ để chân; Giỏ trước; Còi; Đèn; Chỗ để chân chống trượt; Tay đẩy cho phụ huynh; Thanh chắn an toàn có thể tháo rời; Cờ an toàn; Dây an toàn / đai an toàn; Âm thanh/Nhạc; Vô lăng; Tay cầm kéo; Ngăn chứa đồ dưới ghế; Khác
sv: Ridleksak – egenskaper: Justerbart styre; Justerbar sits; Broms; Soltak/solskydd; Mugghållare; Hopfällbar; Fotstöd; Främre korg; Tuta; Belysning; Halkfri fotplatta; Föräldrahandtag; Avtagbar säkerhetsbygel; Säkerhetsflagga; Säkerhetsbälte/sele; Ljud/musik; Ratt; Bogserhandtag; Förvaring under sätet; Annat
el: Χαρακτηριστικά του παιχνιδιού οδήγησης: Ρυθμιζόμενο τιμόνι; Ρυθμιζόμενο κάθισμα; Φρένο; Κουβούκλιο / σκίαστρο; Ποτηροθήκη; Αναδιπλούμενο; Υποπόδια; Μπροστινό καλάθι; Κόρνα; Φώτα; Αντιολισθητική πλατφόρμα ποδιών; Λαβή ώθησης γονέα; Αφαιρούμενη μπάρα οδήγησης; Σημαιάκι ασφαλείας; Ζώνη ασφαλείας / ιμάντας; Ήχοι/Μουσική; Τιμόνι; Λαβή ρυμούλκησης; Χώρος αποθήκευσης κάτω από το κάθισμα; Άλλο
nl: Rijspeelgoed kenmerken: Verstelbaar stuur; Verstelbare zitting; Rem; Luifel / zonnescherm; Bekerhouder; Opvouwbaar; Voetsteunen; Mandje voor; Claxon; Verlichting; Antislipvoetenplank; Duwstang; Verwijderbare beugel; Veiligheidsvlag; Veiligheidsgordel/harnas; Geluiden/muziek; Stuur; Trekhandvat; Opbergruimte onder de zitting; Overig
bg-BG: Характеристики на играчка за яздене: Регулируемо кормило; Регулируема седалка; Спирачка; Сенник/навес; Поставка за чаша; Сгъваемо; Поставки за крака; Предна кошница; Клаксон; Светлини; Неплъзгаща се стъпенка; Дръжка за бутане от родител; Подвижен борд за возене; Предпазен флаг; Предпазен колан/сбруя; Звуци/музика; Волан; Дръжка за теглене; Място за съхранение под седалката; Други
fr: Caractéristiques du jouet à enfourcher: Guidon réglable; Siège réglable; Frein; Auvent / pare-soleil; Porte-gobelet; Pliable; Repose-pieds; Panier avant; Klaxon; Lumières; Marchepied antidérapant; Poignée de poussée parentale; Barre de maintien amovible; Drapeau de sécurité; Ceinture de sécurité / harnais; Sons/musique; Volant; Poignée de remorquage; Espace de rangement sous le siège; Autre
da: Egenskaber for ridelegetøj: Justerbart styr; Justerbart sæde; Bremse; Kaleche/solskærm; Kopholder; Sammenfoldelig; Fodhvilere; Kurv foran; Horn; Lys; Skridsikkert fodbræt; Skubbehåndtag til forældre; Aftagelig sikkerhedsbøjle; Sikkerhedsflag; Sikkerhedssele/sele; Lyd/musik; Rat; Trækhåndtag; Opbevaring under sædet; Andet
tr: Binilebilir oyuncak özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir gidon; Ayarlanabilir koltuk; Fren; Tente / güneşlik; Bardaklık; Katlanabilir; Ayaklıklar; Ön sepet; Korna; Işıklar; Kaymaz basamak; Ebeveyn itme kolu; Çıkarılabilir tutunma barı; Güvenlik bayrağı; Emniyet kemeri / bağlama kayışı; Sesler/müzik; Direksiyon; Çekme kolu; Koltuk altı depolama; Diğer
pt-BR: Brinquedo de montar recursos: Guidão ajustável; Assento ajustável; Freio; Toldo / protetor solar; Porta-copos; Dobrável; Apoio para os pés; Cesta frontal; Buzina; Luzes; Estribo antiderrapante; Alça para os pais; Barra de apoio removível; Bandeira de segurança; Cinto de segurança/arnês; Sons/Músicas; Volante; Alça de reboque; Compartimento sob o assento; Outro
it: Caratteristiche del giocattolo cavalcabile: Manubrio regolabile; Sedile regolabile; Freno; Tettuccio / parasole; Portabicchieri; Pieghevole; Poggiapiedi; Cestino anteriore; Clacson; Luci; Pedana antiscivolo; Maniglione di spinta per genitori; Barra di protezione rimovibile; Bandierina di sicurezza; Cintura di sicurezza / imbracatura; Suoni/Musica; Volante; Maniglia di traino; Vano portaoggetti sotto il sedile; Altro
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale jucăriei de călărit: Ghidon ajustabil; Scaun ajustabil; Frână; Copertină / parasolar; Suport pentru pahar; Pliabil; Suporturi pentru picioare; Coș frontal; Claxon; Lumini; Platformă anti-alunecare; Mâner de împins pentru părinți; Bară de protecție detașabilă; Steag de siguranță; Centură de siguranță / ham; Sunete/Muzică; Volan; Mâner de tractare; Spațiu de depozitare sub scaun; Altele
sl-SI: Lastnosti igrače za jahanje/poganjalca: Nastavljivo krmilo; Nastavljiv sedež; Zavora; Strehica / senčnik; Držalo za pijačo; Zložljivo; Nasloni za noge; Sprednja košara; Hupa; Luči; Nedrseča stojišča; Ročaj za potiskanje (za starše); Odstranljiv varnostni obroč; Varnostna zastavica; Varnostni / varovalni pas; Zvoki/glasba; Volan; Vlečni ročaj; Prostor za shranjevanje pod sedežem; Drugo
ja: 乗用玩具の特徴: 調節可能なハンドルバー; 調節可能なシート; ブレーキ; キャノピー / 日よけ; カップホルダー; 折りたたみ式; フットレスト; フロントバスケット; ホーン; ライト; 滑り止め付きフットボード; 手押しハンドル; 取り外し可能なライドオンバー; セーフティフラッグ; シートベルト / ハーネス; サウンド / 音楽; ステアリングホイール; 牽引ハンドル; シート下収納; その他
zh-TW: 騎乘玩具功能: 可調式把手; 可調式座椅; 煞車; 遮篷/遮陽罩; 杯架; 可摺疊; 腳踏板; 前方置物籃; 喇叭; 車燈; 防滑腳踏板; 家長推把; 可拆卸安全護欄; 安全旗; 安全帶/束帶; 聲音/音樂; 方向盤; 拖曳把手; 座椅下儲物空間; 其他
pl: Cechy jeździka: Regulowana kierownica; Regulowane siedzenie; Hamulec; Daszek / osłona przeciwsłoneczna; Uchwyt na kubek; Składany; Podnóżki; Przedni koszyk; Klakson; Światła; Antypoślizgowy podest; Rączka do pchania dla rodzica; Zdejmowana barierka ochronna; Flaga bezpieczeństwa; Pas bezpieczeństwa / uprząż; Dźwięki/muzyka; Kierownica; Uchwyt do holowania; Schowek pod siedzeniem; Inne
de: Merkmale von Aufsitzspielzeug: Verstellbarer Lenker; Verstellbarer Sitz; Bremse; Verdeck / Sonnenschutz; Getränkehalter; Zusammenklappbar; Fußstützen; Frontkorb; Hupe; Lichter; Rutschfestes Trittbrett; Schiebestange für Eltern; Abnehmbarer Sicherheitsbügel; Sicherheitswimpel; Sicherheitsgurt / Gurt; Geräusche/Musik; Lenkrad; Ziehgriff; Stauraum unter dem Sitz; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 骑乘玩具特点: 可调节车把; 可调节座椅; 刹车; 遮阳篷/遮阳伞; 杯架; 可折叠; 脚踏; 前车筐; 喇叭; 灯光; 防滑脚踏板; 家长推把; 可拆卸骑行杆; 安全旗帜; 安全带/背带; 声音/音乐; 方向盘; 拖车手柄; 座椅下储物空间; 其他
lt-LT: Važinėjimo žaislo savybės: Reguliuojamas vairas; Reguliuojama sėdynė; Stabdžiai; Stogelis / uždanga nuo saulės; Puodelio laikiklis; Sulankstomas; Kojų atramos; Priekinis krepšys; Garso signalas; Šviesos; Neslystanti pėdų atrama; Tėvų stūmimo rankena; Nuimamas apsauginis lankas; Saugos vėliavėlė; Saugos diržas / apraišai; Garsai / muzika; Vairas; Tempimo rankena; Daiktadėžė po sėdyne; Kita
pt-PT: Características do brinquedo de montar: Guiador ajustável; Assento ajustável; Travão; Toldo/para-sol; Porta-copos; Dobrável; Apoios para os pés; Cesto dianteiro; Buzina; Luzes; Estribo antiderrapante; Pega de empurrar para pais; Barra de condução amovível; Bandeira de segurança; Cinto de segurança/arnês; Sons/música; Volante; Pega de reboque; Armazenamento sob o assento; Outra